Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3320
District boundaries; change; notice; contents.

Whether the ordinance creating the offstreet parking district is passed on the initiative of the council or on the petition of landowners, the council shall not change the boundaries, except after notice of intention to do so given by the clerk by one insertion in the newspaper in which the ordinance and notice were published. The notice shall describe the proposed change and specify the time for hearing objections, which shall be at least fifteen days after publication of the notice.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 20, p. 207;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-831;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 20, p. 448.